Utah statutes.
78A-2-108.   Assistants for administrator of the courts -- Appointment of trial court executives.

(1)  The administrator of the courts, with the approval of the presiding officer of the council, is responsible for the establishment of positions and salaries of assistants as necessary to enable him to perform the powers and duties vested in him by this chapter, including the positions of appellate court administrator, district court administrator, juvenile court administrator, and justices' court administrator, whose appointments shall be made by the administrator of the courts with the concurrence of the respective boards as established by the council.

(2)  The district court administrator, with the concurrence of the presiding judge of a district or the district court judge in single judge districts, may appoint in each district a trial court executive.  The trial court executive may appoint, subject to budget limitations, necessary support personnel including clerks, research clerks, secretaries, and other persons required to carry out the work of the court.  The trial court executive shall supervise the work of all nonjudicial court staff and serve as administrative officer of the district.

(3)  Administrators and assistants appointed under this section shall be known collectively as the Administrative Office of the Courts.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

